tr: Ön süsleme türü: Aplike; İşlemeli yama; Deri yama; Yok; PVC veya kauçuk yama; Baskılı; Süblimasyonlu; Dokuma yama; Diğer
en: Front decoration type: Appliqué; Embroidered patch; Leather patch; None; PVC or rubber patch; Printed; Sublimated; Woven patch; Other
pt-PT: Tipo de decoração frontal: Aplique; Emblema bordado; Emblema em pele; Nenhum; Emblema em PVC ou borracha; Estampado; Sublimado; Emblema tecido; Outro
sk-SK: Typ prednej dekorácie: Nášivka; Vyšívaná nášivka; Kožená nášivka; Žiadne; PVC alebo gumená nášivka; Potlačené; Sublimované; Tkaná nášivka; Iné
it: Tipo di decorazione frontale: Applicazione; Toppa ricamata; Toppa in pelle; Nessuna; Toppa in PVC o gomma; Stampata; Sublimata; Toppa in tessuto; Altro
nl: Voorkant decoratietype: Applicatie; Geborduurde patch; Leren patch; Geen; PVC- of rubberen patch; Bedrukt; Gesublimeerd; Geweven patch; Anders
el: Τύπος μπροστινού διακοσμητικού: Απλικέ; Κεντητό μπάλωμα; Δερμάτινο μπάλωμα; Κανένα; Μπάλωμα από PVC ή καουτσούκ; Τυπωμένο; Εξάχνωσης; Υφαντό μπάλωμα; Άλλο
pl: Typ dekoracji z przodu: Aplikacja; Naszywka haftowana; Naszywka skórzana; Brak; Naszywka z PVC lub gumy; Nadruk; Sublimacja; Naszywka tkana; Inne
ja: 正面装飾タイプ: アップリケ; 刺繍パッチ; レザーパッチ; なし; PVC またはラバーパッチ; プリント; 昇華プリント; 織りパッチ; その他
ro-RO: Tipul de decorațiune frontală: Aplicație; Petic brodat; Petic de piele; Niciuna; Petic din PVC sau cauciuc; Imprimat; Sublimat; Petic țesut; Altele
bg-BG: Тип предна декорация: Апликация; Бродирана нашивка; Кожена нашивка; Няма; PVC или гумена нашивка; Принт; Сублимация; Тъкана нашивка; Друго
zh-TW: 正面裝飾類型: 貼花; 刺繡布章; 皮革標; 無; PVC 或橡膠標; 印花; 熱昇華印花; 梭織布章; 其他
lt-LT: Priekinės dekoracijos tipas: Aplikacija; Išsiuvinėtas antsiuvas; Odinis antsiuvas; Nėra; PVC ar guminis antsiuvas; Atspausdinta; Sublimuota; Austas antsiuvas; Kita
zh-CN: 前部装饰类型: 贴花; 刺绣贴片; 皮革贴片; 无; PVC 或橡胶贴片; 印花; 热升华; 梭织贴片; 其他
vi: Loại trang trí phía trước: Thêu đắp nổi; Miếng vá thêu; Miếng vá da; Không có; Miếng vá nhựa PVC/cao su; In; In thăng hoa; Miếng vá dệt; Khác
ko: 전면 장식 유형: 아플리케; 자수 패치; 가죽 패치; 없음; PVC 또는 고무 패치; 프린트; 승화 전사; 우븐 패치; 기타
sv: Typ av dekoration framtill: Applikation; Broderat märke; Lädermärke; Ingen; Märke i PVC eller gummi; Tryckt; Sublimerad; Vävt märke; Övrigt
es: Tipo de decoración frontal: Aplique; Parche bordado; Parche de cuero; Ninguno; Parche de PVC o goma; Estampado; Sublimado; Parche tejido; Otro
hr-HR: Vrsta prednje dekoracije: Aplikacija; Vezeni amblem; Kožni amblem; Bez; PVC ili gumeni amblem; Tiskano; Sublimirano; Tkani amblem; Ostalo
fr: Type d’ornement à l’avant: Appliqué; Écusson brodé; Écusson en cuir; Aucun; Écusson en PVC ou en caoutchouc; Imprimé; Sublimé; Écusson tissé; Autre
sl-SI: Vrsta sprednje dekoracije: Aplikacija; Vezen našitek; Usnjen našitek; Brez; Našitek iz PVC-ja ali gume; Potiskano; Sublimirano; Tkan našitek; Drugo
cs: Typ přední dekorace: Aplikace; Vyšívaná nášivka; Kožená nášivka; Žádná; Nášivka z PVC nebo gumy; Potisk; Sublimace; Tkaná nášivka; Ostatní
de: Art der Frontverzierung: Applikation; Gestickter Aufnäher; Leder-Patch; Keine; PVC- oder Gummi-Patch; Bedruckt; Sublimiert; Gewebter Aufnäher; Sonstige
th: ประเภทการตกแต่งด้านหน้า: งานปะผ้า; อาร์มปัก; ป้ายหนัง; ไม่มี; ป้าย PVC หรือยาง; พิมพ์ลาย; พิมพ์ซับลิเมชัน; อาร์มทอ; อื่นๆ
nb: Type frontdekorasjon: Applikasjon; Brodert merke; Skinnmerke; Ingen; PVC- eller gummimerke; Trykket; Sublimert; Vevd merke; Annet
hu: Elülső dekoráció típusa: Rátét; Hímzett felvarró; Bőr felvarró; Nincs; PVC vagy gumi felvarró; Nyomtatott; Szublimált; Szövött felvarró; Egyéb
fi: Etuosan koristelutyyppi: Applikointi; Brodeerattu kangasmerkki; Nahkamerkki; Ei mitään; PVC- tai kumimerkki; Painettu; Sublimoitu; Kudottu merkki; Muu
ru: Тип переднего декора: Аппликация; Вышитая нашивка; Кожаная нашивка; Нет; Нашивка из ПВХ или резины; Принт; Сублимация; Тканевая нашивка; Другое
da: Fronttypedesign: Applikation; Broderet mærke; Lædermærke; Ingen; PVC- eller gummimærke; Printet; Sublimeret; Vævet mærke; Andet
pt-BR: Tipo de decoração frontal: Aplique; Patch bordado; Patch de couro; Nenhum; Patch de PVC ou borracha; Estampado; Sublimado; Patch de tecido; Outro